Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 77.3 Independent Charter Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-77.3-1.
Entities eligible to apply to become independent charter schools.

Persons or entities eligible to submit an application to establish an independent charter school shall be limited to:

Rhode Island nonprofit organizations provided that these nonprofit organizations shall have existed for at least two (2) years and must exist for a substantial reason other than to operate a school; or

Colleges or universities within the State of Rhode Island.

No child shall be required to attend an independent charter school nor shall any teacher be required to teach in an independent charter school. The sending school district shall make accommodations for those students who wish to participate to transfer into an independent charter school as space permits. If the total number of students who are eligible to attend and apply to an independent charter school is greater than the number of spaces available, the independent charter school shall conduct a lottery to determine which students shall be admitted.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5.

16-77.3-2.
Procedure for creation and expansion of independent charter schools.

Any persons or entities eligible to establish an independent charter public school may submit a proposed charter, or an amendment to a charter for an expansion, to the commissioner. For purposes of this chapter, “expansion” shall be an increase in total enrollment; an increase in the grade levels previously authorized in the charter, or the addition of a school district to the catchment area. The proposed charter shall:

Be submitted to the commissioner no later than December 1st of the school year before the school year in which the independent charter school is to be established;

Describe a plan for education, including the mission, objective, method of providing a basic education, measurable student academic goals that the independent charter school will meet, and process for improving student learning and fulfilling the charter and fulfilling state and national educational goals and standards;

Provide a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days of instruction to students per year;

Indicate performance criteria that will be used to measure student learning and to comply with the charter, state, and national educational goals and standards;

Include an agreement to provide a yearly report to parents, the community, the sending school districts, and the commissioner, that indicates the progress made by the independent charter school during the previous year in meeting the charter objectives;

Present a plan for the governance, administration, and operation of the independent charter school, including the manner in which the governing board of the school will be chosen, the nature and extent of parental, professional educator, and community involvement in the governance and operation of the independent charter school, and the means of ensuring accountability to the commissioner, the sending school districts, and the council on elementary and secondary education;

Identify the building that will house the independent charter school and from whom, and under what terms and conditions, it is to be provided;

Describe what support services will be provided by the sending school district(s), and under what terms and conditions those services are to be provided, and describe what support services the independent charter school will obtain directly from third parties and, to the extent known, under what terms and conditions those services are to be provided;

Explain the procedures that will be followed to ensure the health and safety of pupils and staff;

Describe enrollment procedures, including the permissible criteria for admission in accordance with applicable state and federal law, along with a policy, or policies, that outline outreach and recruitment programs to encourage the enrollment of a diverse student population;

Explain the student discipline procedures;

Explain the relationship that will exist between the proposed independent charter school and its employees, including the terms and conditions of employment and the qualifications that the employees must meet. Teachers and administrators in independent charter schools must be certified pursuant to state law and regulation. Teachers and administrators in independent charter schools shall be entitled to prevailing wages and benefits as enjoyed by other Rhode Island public school teachers and administrators. Employment in an independent charter school shall be considered “service” as that term is defined in chapter 16 of this title for purposes of determining the appropriate step on a salary schedule for certified personnel. Employment in an independent charter school can be considered “service” as that term is defined in chapter 16 of this title for determining status in the teachers’ retirement system. All employees, and prospective employees of an independent charter school shall be deemed to be public school employees, having the same rights under Rhode Island and federal law as employees, and prospective employees at a non-chartered public school;

Identify, with particularity, the state statutes, state regulations, and sending school district(s) rules from which variances are sought in order to facilitate operation of the independent charter school. Explain the reasons for each variance and the alternative method by which the concern that gave rise to the regulation or provision will be addressed;

Provide a financial plan, including a proposed budget for the term of the charter, and an annual audit of the financial and administrative operations of the independent charter school, and the manner in which the funds allocated to the independent charter school will be managed and disbursed;

Provide procedures by which teaching personnel and parents can legally challenge decisions of the governing board of the school that do not conform to the school’s charter;

Provide a copy of the proposed bylaws of the independent charter school; and

Provide written support from town or city council(s) in the proposed catchment area if required pursuant to §

16-77-5.1

.

Any nonprofit organization that seeks to establish an independent charter school must submit its financial records and financial plan for operating the school to the auditor general, who shall review the records, the financial plan, and the financial integrity of the organization. At the time of submission of a proposed charter, the financial records and financial recordkeeping system of the nonprofit organization and the proposed financial plan for the independent charter school shall be reviewed by the auditor general and the auditor general shall, while the proposed charter is being considered for preliminary approval by the council on elementary and secondary education, provide an initial determination to the council on elementary and secondary education, the commissioner, and the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate indicating that the auditor general is satisfied that the nonprofit organization is financially responsible. Final approval for operation of the independent charter school shall not be granted by the council on elementary and secondary education until the auditor general has approved the financial plan and financial-record keeping system and is satisfied that the nonprofit organization is financially responsible. The auditor general shall notify the council on elementary and secondary education, the commissioner, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives of the findings. During the year immediately preceding the September in which the independent charter school is to begin operation, the charter applicant shall make any additional submissions to the auditor general prescribed by the auditor general in the initial determination. Additional submissions during the year prior to the September in which the independent charter school is to begin operation shall include, but not be limited to evidence submitted to the auditor general, not later than June 1st prior to the opening of the independent charter school, of the existence of an agreement, option for lease or purchase, lease agreement, or purchase agreement, contingent upon general assembly funding, for a facility in which the independent charter school will operate in its first year of operation. The auditor general shall have the authority to review independent charter schools affiliated with nonprofit organizations on an annual basis or require the school to have an annual, certified audit in accordance with the same federal and state standards that are applicable to local public school districts. If, as a result of any annual audit, the auditor general believes there are financial irregularities, the auditor general shall withdraw the original approval and the council on elementary and secondary education shall withdraw its approval for the independent charter school to continue operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 466, § 2.

16-77.3-3.
Process for consideration of proposed charter or expansion.

If the commissioner finds the proposed charter to be incomplete, further information may be requested and required. The commissioner shall develop regulations for amending an approved charter, consistent with the provisions of this chapter and §

16-77-5.1

.

After having received a satisfactory, proposed charter or expansion, the commissioner will provide for a public-comment period of not less than sixty (60) days, during which he or she will hold at least two (2) public hearings on the proposed charter. These hearings will be held in the district where the proposed independent charter school is to be located. Any person may file with the commissioner comments, recommendations, and/or objections relevant to the granting of a charter.

The commissioner will decide on whether or not to recommend the granting of the charter or expansion to the council on elementary and secondary education within ninety (90) days after the conclusion of the public-comment period.

If the commissioner recommends the granting of the proposed charter or amendment for expansion, the matter shall be referred to the council on elementary and secondary education for a decision on whether to grant a revocable charter or expansion. The council on elementary and secondary education may grant a charter for a period of up to five (5) years. The decision of the council on elementary and secondary education, complete with reasons and conditions, shall be made available to the public and to the applicant. Charter public school approval for establishment or continuation shall be for up to a five-year (5) period. At the conclusion of each five-year (5) period, the council on elementary and secondary education may conduct a subsequent review of the independent charter school’s charter. If the council on elementary and secondary education does not conduct such a review, the charter shall renew for another five-year (5) period. The commissioner, with approval of the council on elementary and secondary education, shall promulgate rules and regulations for these five-year (5) reviews.

In considering a proposed charter, or an amendment to a charter for expansion, the council on elementary and secondary education shall consider all relevant information, including, but not limited to, the requirements of regulations and law.

In considering a proposed charter, or an amendment to a charter for expansion, the council on elementary and secondary education shall place substantial weight on the fiscal impact on the city or town; programmatic impact on the sending school district; and the educational impact on the students in the district to ensure that the proposal is economically prudent for the city or town and academically prudent for the proposed sending school district and for all students in the sending district.

The commissioner, with the approval of the council on elementary and secondary education, may grant a variance to any provision of title 16, other than those enumerated in §

16-77.3-7

, and to any department of education regulation and to any school district regulation that does not affect the health and safety or civil rights of pupils in independent charter schools.

All proposed charters shall be matters of public record and will be provided to members of the public upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 466, § 2.

16-77.3-4.
Revocation of the charter of an independent charter school.

The board of regents may revoke the charter of an independent charter school at any time, pursuant to §

16-77-5.1

, if the school:

Materially violates any provision contained in the charter;

Fails to meet or pursue the educational objectives contained in the charter;

Fails to comply with fiscal accountability procedures as specified in the charter;

Violates provisions of law that have not been granted variance by the board of regents; or

After three (3) consecutive years of operation, is not a “high-performing charter school,” defined as a charter public school that has demonstrated overall success, including: (i) Substantial progress in improving student achievement and (ii) The management and leadership necessary to establish a thriving, financially viable charter public school.

After denying or prior to non-renewing or revoking a charter, the department of elementary and secondary education will hold a hearing on the issues in controversy under §

16-39-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5.

16-77.3-5.
Budgets and funding.

It is the intent of the general assembly that funding pursuant to this chapter shall be neither a financial incentive nor a financial disincentive to the establishment of an independent charter school. Funding for each independent charter school shall consist of state revenue and municipal or district revenue in the same proportions that funding is provided for other schools within the sending school district(s).

Funding additional to that authorized from the sending school district(s) by subsection (b) may be allocated to the independent charter school from the sending school district(s) to the extent that the combined percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-cost lunch, students with limited English proficiency, and students requiring special education exceed the combined percentage of those students in the sending school district(s) as a whole. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this section regarding the allocation of funds from sending school districts to independent charter schools.

An independent charter school shall be eligible to receive other aids, grants, Medicaid revenue, and other revenue according to Rhode Island law, as though it were a school district. Federal aid received by the state shall be used to benefit students in the independent charter school, if the school qualifies for the aid, as though it were a school district.

An independent charter school may negotiate and contract directly with third parties for the purchase of books, instructional materials, and any other goods and services that are not being provided by the sending school district(s) pursuant to the charter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 4.

16-77.3-6.
Applicability of other provisions of title 16.

The board of regents may grant to independent charter schools variances of specific chapters and sections of this title except to the extent that these chapters and sections are enumerated in §

16-77.3-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5.

16-77.3-7.
Portions of title 16 applicability to independent charter schools.

The following provisions of this title shall be binding on independent charter schools and may not be waived by the commissioner under §

16-77.3-3

:

Section 16-2-2 (minimum length of school year);

Section 16-2-17 (right to a safe school);

Section 16-8-10 (federal funds for school lunch);

Section 16-11-1 (certification of public school teachers);

Section 16-12-3 (duty to cultivate principles of morality);

Section 16-12-10 (immunity for report of suspected substance abuse);

Chapter 13 (teachers’ tenure);

Chapter 16 (teachers’ retirement);

Section 16-19-1 (compulsory attendance);

Section 16-20-1 (school holidays enumerated);

Sections

16-21-3

and 16-21-4 (fire safety);

Sections

16-21-10

,

16-21-14

, and 16-21-16 (health screenings);

Section 16-22-9 (uniform testing);

Section 16-24-2 (regulations of state board);

Section 16-38-1 (discrimination because of race or age);

Section 16-38-1.1 (discrimination because of sex);

Section 16-38-2 (immunizations);

Section 16-38-4 (exclusive club);

Section 16-38-6 (commercial activities prohibited);

Section 16-38-9 (misconduct of school officers);

Section 16-38-10 (power of officials to visit schools);

Section 16-39-1 (appeal of matters of dispute to commissioner);

Section 16-39-2 (appeal of school committee actions to commissioner);

Section 16-39-3 (appeal to state board);

Section 16-39-3.1 (enforcement of final decision);

Section 16-39-3.2 (interim protective orders);

Section 16-39-8 (subpoena power of commissioner);

Section 16-40-16 (student records);

Section 16-71-1 (Educational Record Bill of Rights Act);

Section

16-21-21.1

(penalties for drug, alcohol or weapons offense); and

Chapter 16-21.5 (student interrogations).

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5.

16-77.3-8.
Charter school reporting.

All independent charter schools shall continuously monitor their financial operations by tracking actual versus budgeted revenue and expense. The chief financial officer of the independent charter school shall submit a report on a quarterly basis to the state office of municipal affairs certifying the status of the independent charter school budget. The quarterly reports shall be in a format prescribed by the state office of municipal affairs and the state auditor general. The reports shall contain a statement as to whether any actual or projected shortfalls in budget line items are expected to result in a year-end deficit, the projected impact on year-end financial results including all accruals and encumbrances, and how the independent charter school plans to address any such shortfalls.

The auditor general or the state director of administration may petition the superior court to order the independent charter school to file said reports. The director of administration may also direct the state controller and general treasurer to withhold any funding to the independent charter school until the school complies with the reporting requirements hereunder. Failure to comply with this section shall be cause for the revocation of the school charter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 5.